Florida, session 2026, SB984.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 13 112.1816, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 112.1816âFirefighters; cancer diagnosis.â 15 (4) 16 (c)âFirefighters who die as a result of cancer or 17 circumstances that arise out of the treatment of cancer are 18 considered to have died in the manner as described in s. 19 112.191(2)(a), and all of the benefits arising out of such death 20 are available to the deceased firefighterâs beneficiary. Such 21 death benefits must be made available by the former employer of 22 the firefighter for 1 year after the date on which the 23 firefighter terminated employment so long as the firefighter 24 otherwise met the criteria specified in this subsection when he 25 or she terminated employment and was not employed as a 26 firefighter after that date. 27 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds and declares that this act 28 fulfills an important state interest. 29 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.